District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-1228

Burial assistance.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-221, § 29, 36 DCR 553
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 505(q), 42 DCR 3684
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 2002, 45 DCR 7193
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-1028.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 7 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 4-1201.
For temporary amendment of former § 3-1028 1981 Ed., see § 1602 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794), § 1602 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669), and § 1602 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
Section 1604 of D.C. Act 12-401 provided that title XVI of the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary amendment of former § 3-1028 1981 Ed., see § 1802 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1602 of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1802 of the Service Improvement and Fiscal Year 2000 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-110, July 28, 1999, 46 DCR 6320).

Editor's Notes

Section 3-1028 had been amended March 26, 1999 by D.C. Law 12-175, § 2002, 45 DCR 7193; however effect was given to the repeal of the section by D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, effective April 20, 1999.

Section 3-1028 was amended by D.C. Law 13-38, § 1802, effective October 20, 1999; this amendment was not given effect due to the section’s repeal by D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, effective April 20, 1999.